Utah statutes.
34-48-201.   Employer may not request disclosure of information related to personal Internet account.

An employer may not do any of the following:

(1)  request an employee or an applicant for employment to disclose a username and password, or a password that allows access to the employee's or applicant's personal Internet account; or

(2)  take adverse action, fail to hire, or otherwise penalize an employee or applicant for employment for failure to disclose information described in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

